incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="poskus__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gostinstv/o__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iniciativnost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bolez/en__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nih</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijo</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nimi</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ograj/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ščipalk/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u/činkovitost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitosti</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitostjo</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitost</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitost</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>činkovitost</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Činkovitost</l>
          <r>činkovitost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žaganj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nameščanj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žezlo__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pušk/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="šelestenje"><i>šelestenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="koalicija"><i>koalicij</i><par n="ograj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gostinstvo"><i>gostinstv</i><par n="gostinstv/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prepoznavanje"><i>prepoznavanj</i><par n="žaganj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="navezovanje"><i>navezovanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="izzivanje"><i>izzivanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prevračanje"><i>prevračanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dospetje"><i>dospetje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="načenjanje"><i>načenjanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="brnenje"><i>brnenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dedovanje"><i>dedovanj</i><par n="žaganj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="delničarstvo"><i>delničarstv</i><par n="gostinstv/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="manevriranje"><i>manevriranje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="okrilje"><i>okrilje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="metanje"><i>metanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ščipalka"><i>ščipalk</i><par n="ščipalk/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="puška"><i>pušk</i><par n="pušk/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lepilo"><i>lepilo</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="križpotje"><i>križpotje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="žaganje"><i>žaganj</i><par n="žaganj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pokljanje"><i>pokljanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zorenje"><i>zorenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="razčlenjevanje"><i>razčlenjevanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="staranje"><i>staranje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dojenje"><i>dojenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="upodabljanje"><i>upodabljanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="škripanje"><i>škripanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nabrekanje"><i>nabrekanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zaseganje"><i>zaseganje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="posredništvo"><i>posredništv</i><par n="gostinstv/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="iniciativnost"><i>iniciativnost</i><par n="iniciativnost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="preddverje"><i>preddverje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="učinkovitost"><i>u</i><par n="u/činkovitost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tavanje"><i>tavanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prepričevanje"><i>prepričevanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kljubovanje"><i>kljubovanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="izmenjavanje"><i>izmenjavanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="legitimiranje"><i>legitimiranje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ugodje"><i>ugodje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="žezlo"><i>žezlo</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="plezanje"><i>plezanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ograja"><i>ograj</i><par n="ograj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="seznanjanje"><i>seznanjanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zasipanje"><i>zasipanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bolezen"><i>bolez</i><par n="bolez/en__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="strelivo"><i>strelivo</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dvopičje"><i>dvopičje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zasnovanje"><i>zasnovanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="proizvajanje"><i>proizvajanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prigovarjanje"><i>prigovarjanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nameščanje"><i>nameščanj</i><par n="nameščanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prispetje"><i>prispetje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="osredotočenje"><i>osredotočenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="praženje"><i>praženje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="odgovarjanje"><i>odgovarjanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dovajanje"><i>dovajanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="okostje"><i>okostje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mežikanje"><i>mežikanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="poskus"><i>poskus</i><par n="poskus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prekupčevanje"><i>prekupčevanje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oplemenitenje"><i>oplemenitenje</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="barbarstvo"><i>barbarstvo</i><par n="žezlo__n_nt"/></e>
